Utah statutes.
62A-5-103.   Responsibility and authority of division.

(1)  For purposes of this section "administer" means to:

(a)  plan;

(b)  develop;

(c)  manage;

(d)  monitor; and

(e)  conduct certification reviews.

(2)  The division has the authority and responsibility to:

(a)  administer an array of services and supports for persons with disabilities and their families throughout the state;

(b)  make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, that establish eligibility criteria for the services and supports described in Subsection (2)(a);

(c)  consistent with Section 62A-5-206, supervise the programs and facilities of the Developmental Center;

(d)  in order to enhance the quality of life for a person with a disability, establish either directly, or by contract with private, nonprofit organizations, programs of:

(i)  outreach;

(ii)  information and referral;

(iii)  prevention;

(iv)  technical assistance; and

(v)  public awareness;

(e)  supervise the programs and facilities operated by, or under contract with, the division;

(f)  cooperate with other state, governmental, and private agencies that provide services to a person with a disability;

(g)  subject to Subsection (3), ensure that a person with a disability is not deprived of that person's constitutionally protected rights without due process procedures designed to minimize the risk of error when a person with a disability is admitted to any structured residential mental retardation facility, including:

(i)  the developmental center; and

(ii)  facilities within the community;

(h)  determine whether to approve providers;

(i)  monitor and sanction approved providers, as specified in the providers' contract;

(j)  subject to Section 62A-5-103.5, receive and disburse public funds;

(k)  review financial actions of a provider who is a representative payee appointed by the Social Security Administration;

(l)  establish standards and rules for the administration and operation of programs conducted by, or under contract with, the division;

(m)  approve and monitor division programs to insure compliance with the board's rules and standards;

(n)  establish standards and rules necessary to fulfill the division's responsibilities under Parts 2 and 3 of this chapter with regard to mental retardation facilities;

(o)  assess and collect equitable fees for a person who receives services provided under this chapter;

(p)  maintain records of, and account for, the funds described in Subsection (2)(o);

(q)  establish and apply rules to determine whether to approve, deny, or defer the division's services to a person who is:

(i)  applying to receive the services; or

(ii)  currently receiving the services;

(r)  in accordance with state law, establish rules:

(i)  relating to a mental retardation facility that is an endorsed program; and

(ii)  governing the admission, transfer, and discharge of a person with a disability;

(s)  manage funds for a person residing in a facility operated by the division:

(i)  upon request of a parent or guardian of the person; or

(ii)  under administrative or court order; and

(t)  fulfill the responsibilities described in Chapter 5a, Coordinating Council for Persons with Disabilities.

(3)  The due process procedures described in Subsection (2)(g):

(a)  shall include initial and periodic reviews to determine the constitutional appropriateness of the placement; and

(b)  with regard to facilities in the community, do not require commitment to the division.

